Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-332
Division of Aeronautics; municipalities and political subdivisions; assist in planning and developing.

The Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation may aid and assist municipalities and other political subdivisions of the state in planning, developing, and carrying out programs for airport zoning in order to secure uniformity therein as far as possible.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 16, p. 691;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 64.